Massachusetts, session 194th, H2129.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 148B of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking, in line 9, the word "and" and inserting in place thereof the word:-
'or.'
of 1